North Carolina, session 2025, SB979.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 58-36-30 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-36-30. Deviations.
…
(b1) This subsection applies only to insurance against loss to residential property with not
more than four housing units. A rate in excess of that promulgated by the Bureau may be charged
by an insurer on any specific risk if the higher rate is charged in accordance with rules adopted
by the Commissioner. An insurer shall give notice to the insured that the rates used to calculate
the premium for the policy are greater than those rates that are applicable in the State of North
Carolina. by including the following language in the policy on page one of the declarations page
or on a separate page before the declarations page, in at least 14 point type or in a font size larger
than the remainder of the document whichever is larger, bolded, and all capitalized:

NOTICE: IN ACCORDANCE WITH G.S. 58-36-30(b1), THE PREMIUM BASED UPON
THE APPROVED RATES IN NORTH CAROLINA FOR RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY
INSURANCE COVERAGE APPLIED FOR WOULD BE $____. OUR PREMIUM FOR THIS
COVERAGE IS $____.

The disclosure statement noted above in this subsection shall be included on any renewal of
or endorsement to the policy when the rates charged exceed the approved manual rate. The
insurer shall retain consent to rate information for each insured and make this information
available to the Commissioner, upon request of the Commissioner.Commissioner and with the
knowledge and consent of the insured.
At least 60 days prior to charging a higher rate an insurer shall notify the insured: (i) that the
rates used to calculate the premium for the policy will be greater than those rates that are
applicable in the State of North Carolina, (ii) what the premium based upon approved rates in
*S979-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
North Carolina for residential property would be, (iii) what the insurer's premium for this
coverage will be, (iv) of the specific justification for charging the greater rate, and (v) of any
actions the insured could take to mitigate the insurer's justification for charging a higher rate. The
notice and consent required by this subsection may be in electronic form and delivered by
electronic means.
Any data obtained by the Commissioner under this subsection is proprietary and confidential
and is not a public record under G.S. 132-1 or G.S. 58-2-100.
(b2) Notwithstanding subsection (b1) of this section, the Commissioner shall collect
annually from all insurers and publish on the Department's website no later than July 1 the
following data aggregated across all insurers for each geographical rate-making territory:
(1) The percentage of policies for which a consent to rate has been obtained.The
number of policies in effect, or other exposures insured. For the purposes of
this subsection, "policies in effect" shall mean the number of policies written
in the reporting year, and "other exposures," if any, shall mean any coverage
extended other than policies written, and shall be described in the report in
sufficient detail to identify the coverage provided.
(2) The average difference between the approved premium and the consented
premium.The number of applications for coverage.
(3) The number of applications for which coverage was not provided, classified
according to applications withdrawn, applications denied, and applications
still in process.
(4) The number of policies not renewed, classified according to nonrenewals
initiated by the insurer, and nonrenewals initiated by the policyholder, with
subclassifications to include the following reasons for nonrenewal:
a. For nonrenewals initiated by the insurer: (i) lack of payment, (ii)
misrepresentation, (iii) property features, (iv) climate risk, (v)
reduction in service area, or (vi) other.
b. For nonrenewals initiated by the policyholder: (i) cost, (ii) untimely
settlement of claims, (iii) unsatisfactory customer service, (iv)
identification of more suitable insurance options, (v) vacating
property, or (vi) other.
(5) The number of policies canceled or terminated.
(6) The number of claims filed.
(7) The number of claims approved, classified according to in whole, in part, and
number of days lapsed from claim filed to approval.
(8) The number of claims denied, classified according to in whole, in part, and
number of days lapsed from claim filed to denial.
(9) The dollar amounts of the losses incurred.
(10) The dollar amounts of the losses paid.
(11) The dollar amounts of the premium charged for coverage.
(12) Applicable rates for each form of property insurance and rating classification,
including rates by tier in multitier programs, and differentiating between
policies with varying types of benefits, including, but not limited to,
guaranteed replacement cost, standard or limited replacement cost, market
value or actual cash value, and differentiating among policies issued for
single-family homes, multifamily homes, condominium or cooperative units,
and business properties or farms.
(13) The deductible, classified as a percentage of the insured property's value.
(14) For covered insurance companies distributing through direct solicitation, the
number of direct mail or telephone solicitations.
(15) The number of agents appointed by the covered insurance company.
Page 2 Senate Bill 979-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(16) The street addresses of all offices issuing or servicing policies.
(17) Languages spoken, other than English, with sufficient fluency to conduct
business in that language by personnel within each office.
(18) Whether the covered insurance company issues policies in a language other
than English and, if so, identifying the languages in which policies are issued
and the number of policies issued in each language.
(19) For each of the categories of information described in subdivisions (1) through
(13) of this subsection, further classifications and aggregated data according
to race, national origin, ethnicity, household income level, and gender of the
insureds or applicants according to categories and subcategories as defined by
the federal Office of Management and Budget's Statistical Policy Directive
No. 15 for race and ethnicity data, as well as classifications and aggregated
data by race, national origin, ethnicity, and income level characteristics of the
census tract in which the insured risk is located including whether the insured
risk is located in a disadvantaged community. Where an insurer applies any
other classification which affects the premium rate at which the policy is
issued, such as credit score or credit-based insurance score, the insurer shall
provide totals by race, national origin, ethnicity, household income level, and
gender for each such classification and applicable premium rate based on the
modifying classification. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
subsection, data collected pursuant to subdivision (13) of this subsection will
not be reported as aggregated data but as individual record data as described
in subdivision (23) of this subsection.
(20) The information upon which an insurer, rate service organization, or group of
insurers filed with the Commissioner in support of the rates as required to be
filed with the Commissioner. An insurer or group of insurers which are
members or subscribers of a rate service organization which makes or files
rates on its behalf shall be responsible for filing of the information as part of
the report required by this subdivision.
(21) The total dollar amount of financing to fossil fuel businesses, including
investments and underwriting in terms of total gross premiums in dollars,
disaggregated by company and project in a format determined by the
Commissioner.
(22) The total dollar amount of financing for new fossil fuel projects, including
investments and underwriting in terms of total gross premiums in dollars,
disaggregated by company and project in a format determined by the
Commissioner.
(23) In addition to aggregate data required to be reported under this subsection,
each insurer shall file with the Commissioner, and make available to the
public, the individual record data collected pursuant to subdivisions (1)
through (13) of this subsection, as well as data related to modifying
classifications if relevant as described in subdivision (17) of this subsection,
from which the report summaries were tabulated. Such data shall be provided
in an online electronic database format prescribed by the Commissioner, and
the Commissioner shall make such database files available directly to the
public. The Commissioner shall require that all information which would
personally identify any individual applicant or policyholder be deleted. The
categories of data to be made available for each individual record shall include
all of the same categories of information collected pursuant to subdivisions
(1) through (13) of this subsection, as well as data related to modifying
classifications if relevant as described in subdivision (17) of this subsection,
Senate Bill 979-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
contained in the aggregate report and shall be presented in accordance with
standardized classification codes to be established by the Commissioner.
The Commissioner shall designate the format and manner to collect the data to be published.
Any nonaggregated data obtained by the Commissioner, including data identifying individual
insurers or insureds, under this subsection is proprietary and confidential and is not a public
record under G.S. 132-1 or G.S. 58-2-100. This subsection applies only to insurance against loss
to residential real property with not more than four housing units.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 58-36-90 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-36-90. Prohibitions on using Using credit scoring to rate noncommercial private
passenger motor vehicle and residential property insurance;
exceptions.insurance prohibited.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section:
(1) "Adverse action" has the same meaning as in section 1681a(k) of the federal
Fair Credit Reporting Act and includes a denial or cancellation of, an increase
in any charge for, or a reduction or other adverse or unfavorable change in the
terms of coverage or amount of any insurance, existing or applied for, in
connection with the underwriting of insurance.
(2) "Credit report" means any written, oral, or other communication of any
information by a consumer reporting agency that bears on a consumer's credit
worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity. Credit report does not include
accident or traffic violation records as maintained by the North Carolina
Division of Motor Vehicles or any other law enforcement agency, a property
loss report or claims history that does not include information that bears on a
consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity, or any report
containing information solely as to transactions or experiences between the
consumer and the person making the report.
(3) "Credit score" means a score that is derived by utilizing data from an
individual's credit report in an algorithm, computer program, model, or other
process that reduces the data to a number or rating.
(4) "Noncommercial private passenger motor vehicle" means a "private passenger
motor vehicle," as defined by G.S. 58-40-10, that is neither insured under a
commercial policy nor used for commercial purposes.
(5) "Private passenger motor vehicle" has the same meaning as set forth in
G.S. 58-40-10.
(6) "Residential property" means real property with not more than four housing
units located in this State, the contents thereof and valuable interest therein,
and insurance coverage written in connection with the sale of that property. It
also includes mobile homes, modular homes, townhomes, condominiums, and
insurance on contents of apartments and rental property used for residential
purposes.
(b) Prohibitions; Exceptions. – In the rating and underwriting of noncommercial private
passenger motor vehicle and residential property insurance coverage, insurers shall not use credit
scoring as the sole a basis for terminating an existing policy or any coverage in an existing policy
or subjecting a policy to consent to rate as specified in G.S. 58-36-30(b) without consideration
of any other risk factors, but insurers G.S. 58-36-30. Insurers may use credit scoring as the sole
basis for discounting rates. For purposes of this subsection only, "existing policy" means a policy
that has been in effect for more than 60 days.
(c) Notification. – If a credit report is used in conjunction with other criteria to take an
adverse action, the insurer shall provide the applicant or policyholder with written notice of the
Page 4 Senate Bill 979-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
action taken, in a form approved by the Commissioner. The notification shall include, in easily
understandable language:
(1) The specific reason for the adverse action and, if the adverse action was based
upon a credit score, a description of the factors that were the primary influence
on the score.
(2) The name, address, and toll-free telephone number of the credit bureau that
provided the insurer with the credit-based information.
(3) The fact that the consumer has the right to obtain a free copy of the consumer's
credit report from the appropriate credit bureau.
(4) The fact that the consumer has the right to challenge information contained in
the consumer's credit report.
(d) Disputed Credit Report Information. – If it is determined through the dispute
resolution process set forth in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681i(a)(5), that
the credit information of a current insured was incorrect or incomplete and if the insurer receives
notice of such determination from either the consumer reporting agency or from the insured, the
insurer shall re-underwrite or re-rate the consumer within 30 days of receiving the notice. After
re-underwriting or re-rating the insured, the insurer shall make any adjustments necessary,
consistent with its underwriting guidelines. If an insurer determines the insured has overpaid
premium, the insurer shall refund to the insured the amount of overpayment calculated back to
the shorter of either the last 12 months of coverage or the actual policy period.
(e) Indemnification. – An insurer shall indemnify, defend, and hold insurance producers
harmless from and against all liability, fees, and costs arising out of or relating to the actions,
errors, or omissions of an insurance producer who obtains or uses credit information or credit
scores for an insurer, provided the insurance producer follows the instructions or procedures
established by the insurer and complies with any applicable law or regulation. Nothing in this
subsection shall be construed to provide a consumer or other insured with a cause of action that
does not exist in the absence of this subsection.
(f) Filing. – Insurers that use credit scores to underwrite and rate risks shall file their
scoring models, or other scoring processes, with the Department. A filing that includes credit
scoring may include loss experience justifying the applicable surcharge or credit. A filer may
request that its credit score data be considered a trade secret and may designate parts of its filings
accordingly."
SECTION 3. The Department of Insurance shall adopt rules to implement Sections
1 and 2 of this act.
SECTION 4.(a) The Department of Insurance (DOI) shall study the feasibility of
and methodology for gradually reducing the number of rate deviations authorized by
G.S. 58-36-30. The study shall develop a plan for reducing the percentage of households
consenting to rates in excess of that promulgated by the North Carolina Rate Bureau pursuant to
G.S. 58-36-30 to twenty percent (20%) of the statement insurance market or lower. The plan
shall (i) implement the reduction in usage of deviations pursuant to G.S. 58-36-30 by no later
than January 1, 2040, and (ii) include strategies for preserving access to insurance while gradually
reducing the usage of deviations pursuant to G.S. 58-36-30.
SECTION 4.(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, DOI shall conduct a public awareness
campaign on the usage of rate deviations pursuant to G.S. 58-36-30 by insurers. The campaign
shall include education and recommendations relating to risk reduction and home resilience for
insureds.
SECTION 4.(c) No later than October 1, 2027, DOI shall report specific proposals
for implementing the plan developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the chairs of the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government.
Senate Bill 979-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Insurance the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to conduct the study and public awareness campaign required by this act.
SECTION 6. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective October 1, 2027, and
apply to policies issued, amended, or renewed on or after that date. Section 5 of this act becomes
effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 6 Senate Bill 979-First Edition